Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-801.01
Internal Revenue Code; reference.

Except as provided by Article VIII, section 1B, of the Constitution of Nebraska and in sections 77-1106, 77-1108, 77-1109, 77-1117, 77-1119, 77-2701.01, 77-2714 to 77-27,123, 77-27,191, 77-2902, 77-2906, 77-2908, 77-2909, 77-4103, 77-4104, 77-4108, 77-5509, 77-5515, 77-5527 to 77-5529, 77-5539, 77-5717 to 77-5719, 77-5728, 77-5802, 77-5803, 77-5806, 77-5903, 77-6302, 77-6306, 77-6509, 77-6513, 77-6519, 77-6546, 77-6551, 77-6811, 77-6815, 77-6819, 77-6821, 77-6822, 77-6831, 77-6834, 77-6842, 77-6908, 77-6913, 77-6915, 77-6916, and 77-6925, any reference to the Internal Revenue Code refers to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as it exists on April 12, 2018.

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 984, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 46, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1015, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 33, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 944, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 122, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 45;

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 281, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 1017, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 383, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1003, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB315, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB896, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB251, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB879, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB134, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB389, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB725, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 20;

Laws 2013, LB24, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB191, § 13;

Laws 2014, LB739, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB171, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB234, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1091, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 118;

Laws 2021, LB544, § 29;

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 14.
April 17, 2026